tr: Viraj denge çubuğu ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir (bıçak tipi); Ayarlanabilir (çok delikli); Ayarlanamaz; Diğer
ro-RO: Capacitatea de ajustare a barei stabilizatoare: Ajustabilă (tip lamelă); Ajustabilă (cu mai multe orificii); Neajustabilă; Altele
es: Ajuste de la barra estabilizadora: Ajustable (estilo cuchilla); Ajustable (múltiples orificios); No ajustable; Otra
fi: Kallistuksenvakaimen säädettävyys: Säädettävä (lattamalli); Säädettävä (monireikäinen); Ei säädettävä; Muu
fr: Réglage de la barre antiroulis: Réglable (style lame); Réglable (multi-trous); Non réglable; Autre
pt-BR: Barra estabilizadora ajuste: Ajustável (tipo lâmina); Ajustável (vários furos); Não ajustável; Outro
it: Regolazione della barra stabilizzatrice: Regolabile (a lama); Regolabile (multiforo); Non regolabile; Altro
sv: Justerbarhet för krängningshämmare: Justerbar (bladmodell); Justerbar (flera hål); Ej justerbar; Annan
el: Ρύθμιση ράβδου ταλάντωσης: Ρυθμιζόμενη (τύπου λεπίδας); Ρυθμιζόμενη (πολλαπλών οπών); Μη ρυθμιζόμενη; Άλλο
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť stabilizačnej tyče: Nastaviteľný (čepelový typ); Nastaviteľný (viacero otvorov); Nenastaviteľný; Iné
cs: Nastavitelnost stabilizátoru: Nastavitelné (nožové); Nastavitelné (vícedírkové); Nenastavitelné; Jiné
lt-LT: Stabilizatoriaus reguliuojamumas: Reguliuojamas (plokštelinis); Reguliuojamas (kelių skylių); Nereguliuojamas; Kita
sl-SI: Nastavljivost stabilizatorja podvozja: Prilagodljivo (v obliki rezila); Prilagodljivo (z več luknjami); Neprilagodljivo; Drugo
da: Justerbarhed for krængningsstabilisator: Justerbar (klingestil); Justerbar (med flere huller); Ikke-justerbar; Andet
ja: スタビライザーバー調整機能: 調整可能 (ブレードスタイル); 調整可能 (マルチホール); 調整不可; その他
nb: Justerbarhet av dreiestabilisator: Justerbar (bladstil); Justerbar (flere hull); Ikke justerbar; Annet
th: การปรับเหล็กกันโคลง: ปรับได้ (แบบเบลด); ปรับได้ (แบบหลายรู); ปรับไม่ได้; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Регулируемост на стабилизиращата щанга: Регулируема (тип blade); Регулируема (с няколко отвора); Нерегулируема; Друго
ru: Регулируемость стабилизатора поперечной устойчивости: Регулируемый (ножевого типа); Регулируемый (многоточечный); Нерегулируемый; Другое
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade da barra estabilizadora: Ajustável (estilo lâmina); Ajustável (vários furos); Não ajustável; Outro
pl: Możliwość regulacji drążka stabilizatora: Regulowany (płytkowy); Regulowany (wielootworowy); Nieregulowany; Inna
hr-HR: Podesivost stabilizatora: Podesivo (stil oštrice); Podesivo (više rupa); Nije podesivo; Ostalo
ko: 스웨이 바 조절 가능 여부: 조절형(블레이드 스타일); 조절형(다중 구멍); 비조절형; 기타
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh thanh ổn định: Có thể điều chỉnh (kiểu lưỡi dao); Có thể điều chỉnh (nhiều lỗ); Không thể điều chỉnh; Khác
en: Sway bar adjustability: Adjustable (blade-style); Adjustable (multi-hole); Non-adjustable; Other
zh-TW: 防傾桿可調整性: 可調式 (刀片型); 可調式 (多孔); 不可調式; 其他
de: Einstellbarkeit des Stabilisators: Verstellbar (Blade-Stil); Verstellbar (Mehrloch); Nicht verstellbar; Sonstige
zh-CN: 防倾杆可调节性: 可调（叶片式）; 可调（多孔）; 不可调; 其他
hu: Kanyarstabilizátor állíthatósága: Állítható (kardos); Állítható (több furatos); Nem állítható; Egyéb
nl: Stabilisatorstang verstelbaarheid: Verstelbaar (blade-stijl); Verstelbaar (meerdere gaten); Niet-verstelbaar; Overig